Arkansas, session 2025, SB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-57-219(a), concerning permits and annual
privilege fees under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) The annual privilege fee for each permit authorized by § 26-57-215
is established as follows:
(1) Wholesale Permit (Tobacco Products, Vapor Products,
Alternative Nicotine Products, or E-liquid Products) ................. $1,000
(2) Vendor Permit ......................................... $100
(3) Vending Machine Permit (per machine) ................ $10.00
*JLL138*
03/17/2025 5:24:34 PM JLL138

SB494
(4) Retail Permit (Tobacco Products, Vapor Products, Alternative
Nicotine Products, or E-liquid Products) ............................... $100
(5) Retail Vapor Product and E-liquid Product Only Permit
...................................................................... $50.00
(6) Wholesaler's Salesperson Permit ..................... $25.00
(7) Manufacturer's Salesperson Permit ................... $25.00
(8) Manufacturer Cigarette Only Permit .................... $500
(9)(A) Manufacturer Tobacco Products, and Vapor Products,
Alternative Nicotine Products, or E-liquid Products Only Permit ........ $500
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(9)(A) (a)(8)(A) of
this section, manufacturers or importers who deal solely in cigars may submit
a copy of their current federal tobacco import license or federal tobacco
manufacturers' license to Arkansas Tobacco Control when applying for a
Manufacturer Tobacco Products, and Vapor Products, Alternative Nicotine
Products, or E-liquid Products Only Permit to receive the permit at no cost.
(10) Manufacturer Vapor Product and E-liquid Product Only Permit
........................................................................ $500
(11) Vapor Product and E-liquid Product Exclusive Permit
(Manufacturer, Wholesaler, and Retailer) ............................. $1,000

















03/17/2025 5:24:34 PM JLL138